Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Article 10. Exemption from Taxation; Tort Liability.

§ 33.2-1933.
Public purpose; exemption from taxation.

It is hereby found, determined, and declared that the creation of any transportation district pursuant to this chapter and the carrying out of the corporate purposes of any such transportation district is in all respects for the benefit of the people of the Commonwealth and is a public purpose and that the transportation district and the commission will be performing an essential governmental function in the exercise of the powers conferred by this chapter. Accordingly, the transportation district shall not be required to pay taxes or assessments upon any of the property acquired by it or under its jurisdiction, control, possession, or supervision or upon its activities in the operation and maintenance of any transportation facilities or upon any revenues therefrom, and the property and the income derived therefrom shall be exempt from all state, municipal, and local taxation. This exemption shall include all motor vehicle license fees, motor vehicle sales and use taxes, retail sales and use taxes, and motor fuel taxes. The governing body of any political subdivision within a transportation district may refund in whole or in part any payments for taxes or license fees or abate in whole or in part any assessments for taxes or license fees on any property exempt from taxation or license fees under this section that were assessed and levied prior to the acquisition of any transportation facilities by a transportation district.

History.

1964, c. 631, § 15.1-1370; 1975, c. 486; 1997, c. 587, § 15.1-4532; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1934.
Liability for torts.

Every district shall be liable for its torts and those of its officers, employees, and agents committed in the conduct of any proprietary function but shall not be liable for any torts occurring in the performance of a governmental function. However, this section shall not apply to a transportation district subject to the provisions of the Virginia Tort Claims Act (§

8.01-195.1

et seq.).

History.

1964, c. 631, § 15.1-1371; 1986, c. 584; 1991, c. 23; 1997, c. 587, § 15.1-4533; 2014, c. 805.